Louisiana, session 2026, SB319.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:431(A)(1)(b)(iii) and (B)(1), 433(A)(3), 562(A), 571(A)(8),
573(E), and 1309(D) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§431. Commissioners; courses of instruction; certificates; reports; list of certified
persons furnished by parish board of election supervisors
A.(1)(a) * * *
(b) The clerk shall provide the following in accordance with minimum
standards issued by the secretary of state to the persons who attend the course of
instruction:
* * *
(iii) Instruction on a commissioner's duty to offer any voter who does not
have picture identification an affidavit to sign to that effect as provided in R.S.
18:562(A)(2)(a) the opportunity to provide identification in accordance with
R.S. 18:562(A)(2)(c) and (d).
* * *
B.(1) The clerk of court shall conduct a course of instruction for
commissioners-in-charge, commissioners, and alternate commissioners who are
Page 1 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
selected to serve in each election. The course shall be held after the selection of these
officials but not less than four days prior to each election. The course shall primarily
cover the procedures to be used in the election for which the officials were selected.
The clerk of court shall instruct the commissioners-in-charge, commissioners, and
alternate commissioners that it is their duty to offer any voter who does not have
picture identification as provided in R.S. 18:562 an affidavit to sign to that effect
(A)(2)(a) the opportunity to provide identification in accordance with R.S.
18:562(A)(2)(c) and (d).
* * *
§433. Commissioners-in-charge; course of instruction; selection; commission;
disqualification; replacement
A. Course of instruction. (1) * * *
* * *
(3) During the week prior to the date scheduled for the course of instruction,
the clerk shall notify each commissioner of the date, time, and place where he will
conduct the course of instruction. The course of instruction shall include but shall not
necessarily be restricted to instruction in the operating of voting machines, relevant
laws and regulations concerning the conduct of elections, and matters pertaining to
the powers and duties of commissioners-in-charge. The clerk shall instruct the
commissioners-in-charge that it is their duty to offer inform any voter who does not
have picture identification as provided in R.S. 18:562(A)an affidavit to sign to that
effect (2)(a) of the opportunity to provide identification in accordance with R.S.
18:562(A)(2)(c) and (d).
* * *
§562. Prerequisites to voting
A. Identification of voters.
(1) A person who desires to vote in a primary or general election shall give
his name and address to a commissioner, who shall announce the applicant's name
and address to the persons at the polling place.
(2)(a) Each applicant shall identify himself, in the presence and view of the
Page 2 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
bystanders, and present to the commissioners one of the following:
(i) A Louisiana driver's license,.
(ii) a A Louisiana special identification card issued pursuant to R.S. 40:1321,
or other generally recognized picture identification card that contains the name and
signature of the applicant.
(iii) A United States passport book.
(iv) A United States Certificate of Citizenship that contains the
applicant's name, picture, and signature.
(v) A United States Certificate of Naturalization that contains the
applicant's name, picture, and signature.
(vi) A tribal identification card issued by a tribe recognized by the state
of Louisiana or the federal government that contains the applicant's name,
picture, and signature.
(ii)(vii) A United States military identification card that contains the
applicant's name and picture.
(b) If the applicant does not have one of the forms of identification provided
in Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, the applicant shall complete and sign an
affidavit, which is supplied by the secretary of state, to that effect before the
commissioners, which affidavit shall include the applicant's date of birth and
mother's maiden name. If the applicant is unable to read or write or is otherwise
unable to complete the affidavit due to disability, the applicant may receive
assistance in completing the affidavit and the commissioner shall make a notation
on the affidavit. The applicant may receive the assistance of any person of his choice,
including a commissioner, except a candidate, commissioner-in-charge, the
applicant's employer or employer's agent, or the applicant's union agent. The
commissioners shall place the affidavit in the envelope marked "Registrar of Voters"
and attach the envelope to the precinct register. However, an applicant who is
allowed to vote without the picture identification required by Subparagraph (a) of
this Paragraph is subject to challenge as provided in R.S. 18:565 present two forms
of identification consisting of either two primary documents listed in
Page 3 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
Subparagraph (c) or one primary document listed in Subparagraph (c) and one
secondary document listed in Subparagraph (d).
(c) Primary documents.
(i) An original or certified domestic birth certificate.
(ii) Birth registration card or certificate issued by the state bureau of
vital statistics.
(iii) Certificate of Birth Abroad issued by the United States Department
of State.
(iv) Certificate of Naturalization.
(v) Certificate of Citizenship.
(vi) Social Security card.
(vii) United States passport card.
(viii) Tribal identification card issued by a tribe recognized by the state
of Louisiana or the federal government that does not contain the applicant's
picture or signature.
(ix) A United States veteran health identification card.
(d) Secondary documents.
(i) Voter registration notice.
(ii) Current utility bill, not more than twelve months old, containing the
name and address of the voter.
(iii) Bank statement, not more than twelve months old, containing the
name and address of the voter.
(iv) Government check or document, not more than twelve months old,
containing the name and address of the voter.
(v) Paycheck or pay stub, not more than twelve months old, containing
the name and address of the voter.
(e) If the applicant does not have one of the forms of identification
provided in Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph, the applicant
shall go to any office of the registrar of voters in the parish in which the
applicant is registered to cast a conditional paper ballot no later than 8:00 p.m.
Page 4 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
on election day. No later than 4:30 pm on the second day following the election,
the applicant shall also appear in person to present to the registrar of voters
identification as provided in 18:562(A)(2)(a) through (d).
(f) All conditional paper ballots shall be presented to the parish board
of election supervisors for counting or rejection prior to the compilation of
returns pursuant to R.S. 18:574 at the office of the registrar of voters or at a
public facility within the parish designated by the parish board of election
supervisors. If the applicant has presented identification in accordance with this
Subsection, the board shall count the conditional paper ballot. If the applicant
failed to present identification in accordance with this Subsection, the board
shall reject the conditional paper ballot.
(g) The secretary of state shall promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act necessary to effectuate the provisions of this
Section.
* * *
§571. Procedures for commissioners after termination of voting
A. At the termination of voting in a primary or general election, the
commissioners shall announce that voting is terminated. The commissioners in the
presence of the watchers shall immediately:
* * *
(8) Place one copy of the official election results reports, one copy of the
machine certificates, one of the duplicate poll lists, all original executed challenges
of voters, all precinct register corrections, all voter identification affidavits, all voter
assistance forms, any physicians' certificates, any copies of disability documentation,
a copy of each completed notation of irregularities form, and any address
confirmation notices in the envelope marked "Registrar of Voters", seal it and attach
it to the precinct register after the termination of voting, and place a new protective
seal on the precinct register.
* * *
§573. Evidence of election results
Page 5 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
* * *
E. Transmission and disposition of original challenges, duplicate voters'
affidavits, and address confirmation notices. (1) At the opening of the voting
machines, the sealed precinct registers shall be immediately returned to the registrar
of voters. Upon receipt of the sealed precinct registers, the registrar shall remove any
attached original record of challenges of voters made during the election, any
precinct register correction affidavits, any voter identification affidavits made
pursuant to R.S. 18:562, any address confirmation notices, any voter assistance
forms, any certificates, any copies of disability documentation, and any completed
voter registration applications.
(2) The registrar shall utilize the procedures set forth in Part V of Chapter 4
of this Code to determine the validity of the registration of each challenged voter
who did not submit an address confirmation notice. In any instance where an address
confirmation notice was received that stated an address different from the address
on file in the registrar's office for a registrant, the registrar shall change the
registrant's address to the address on the address confirmation notice if the change
of address is in the parish; transfer the registrant's registration to another parish if the
address on the address confirmation notice is in another parish; or cancel the
registration if the address on the address confirmation notice is in another state. If an
address confirmation notice was received that affirmed the address on file in the
registrar's office, the registrar shall reinstate the registrant to the official list of voters
if the registrant appears on the inactive list of voters. If the address confirmation
notice was a result of a valid challenge, the registrar shall so inform the district
attorney and shall transmit to him the address confirmation notice of that person.
(3) The registrar also shall proceed to determine if each voter submitting a
voter identification affidavit made pursuant to R.S. 18:562 attesting that he is a
qualified registered voter is in fact a registered voter qualified to vote in the election
by comparing the information provided by the voter with the information on file in
the registrar's office and by reasonably comparing the signature on the affidavit with
any signature on file for the voter in the registrar's office. If the registrar determines
Page 6 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
that any person who has voted in the election by virtue of his submission of such an
affidavit was not a registered voter qualified to vote in the election, the registrar shall
so inform the elections compliance unit and shall transmit to it the affidavit of that
person.
(4) The registrar shall scan the address confirmation notice, voter
identification affidavit, voter assistance form, or voter registration application and
add it to the voter's record in the state voter registration computer system after
processing.
* * *
§1309. Early voting; verification
* * *
D.(1)(a) Before any voter is allowed to vote during early voting, the registrar
or his deputy shall establish the voter's identity by requiring him to submit one of the
following:
(i) A Louisiana driver's license,.
(ii) a A Louisiana special identification card issued pursuant to R.S. 40:1321,
or other generally recognized picture identification card that contains the name and
signature of the voter..
(ii)(iii) A United States military identification card that contains the voter's
name and picture;.
(iv) A United States passport book.
(v) A United States Certificate of Citizenship that contains the
applicant's name, picture, and signature.
(vi) A United States Certificate of Naturalization that contains the
applicant's name, picture, and signature.
(vii) A tribal identification card issued by a tribe recognized by the state
of Louisiana or the federal government that contains the applicant's name,
picture, and signature.
(b) If the voter does not have one of the forms of identification provided in
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph, the voter shall complete and sign, in the presence
Page 7 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
of the registrar or his deputy, a voter identification affidavit to that effect provided
by the secretary of state, which affidavit shall include the voter's date of birth and
mother's maiden name. If the voter is unable to read or write or is otherwise unable
to complete the affidavit due to disability, the voter may receive assistance in
completing the affidavit, and the registrar or his deputy shall make a notation on the
affidavit. The voter may receive the assistance of any person of his choice, including
the registrar or his deputy, except a candidate, the voter's employer or employer's
agent, or the voter's union agent. The registrar or his deputy shall retain the affidavit
in the office of the registrar of voters. present two forms of identification
consisting of either two primary documents listed in Subparagraph (c) or one
primary document listed in Subparagraph (c) and one secondary document
listed in Subparagraph (d).
(c) Primary documents.
(i) An original or certified domestic birth certificate.
(ii) Birth registration card or certificate issued by the state bureau of
vital statistics.
(iii) Certificate of Birth Abroad issued by the United States Department
of State.
(iv) Certificate of Naturalization.
(v) Certificate of Citizenship.
(vi) Social Security card.
(vii) United States passport card.
(viii) Tribal identification card issued by a tribe recognized by the state
of Louisiana or the federal government that does not contain the applicant's
picture or signature.
(ix) A United States veteran health identification card.
(d) Secondary documents.
(i) Voter registration notice.
(ii) Current utility bill, not more than twelve months old, containing the
name and address of the voter.
Page 8 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
(iii) Bank statement, not more than twelve months old, containing the
name and address of the voter.
(iv) Government check or document, not more than twelve months old,
containing the name and address of the voter.
(v) Paycheck or pay stub, not more than twelve months old, containing
the name and address of the voter.
(e) If the voter does not have one of the forms of identification provided
in Subparagraph (D)(1)(a)(i) through (d) of this Paragraph, the voter shall cast
a conditional paper ballot. No later than 4:30 pm on the second day following
the election, the voter shall also appear in person to present to the registrar of
voters a form of identification as provided in 18:562(A)(2)(a) through (d).
(f) All conditional paper ballots shall be presented to the parish board
of election supervisors for counting or rejection prior to the compilation of
returns pursuant to R.S. 18:574 at the office of the registrar of voters or at a
public facility within the parish designated by the parish board of election
supervisors. The registrar of voters shall present the conditional paper ballot
to the parish board of election supervisors for counting on the third day after
the election. If the voter has presented identification in accordance with this
Subsection, the board shall count the conditional paper ballot. If the voter failed
to present identification in accordance with this Subsection, the board shall
reject the conditional paper ballot.
(g) The secretary of state shall adopt guidance, pursuant to R.S. 18:18,
necessary to effectuate the provisions of this Section.
(c)(h) If satisfied that the voter has identified himself as the voter registered
in the state voter registration computer system and that he is qualified to vote, the
registrar or his deputy shall initial the early voting register kept by the registrar
opposite the voter's signature or mark. The voter then shall be allowed to vote.
(d) A voter who votes without the picture identification required by
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph is subject to challenge as provided in R.S.
18:1315.
Page 9 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 319 ENROLLED
(2) If the voter's name is found in the state voter registration computer system
on the inactive list of voters, the voter shall be required to complete an address
confirmation card to determine his eligibility to vote.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 10 of 10
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.